Illinois, session 104th, SB280.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 5amended by changing Sections 401 and 401.1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 570/401)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1401)7    Sec. 401. Manufacture or delivery, or possession with 8intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance, a 9counterfeit substance, or controlled substance analog. Except 10as authorized by this Act, it is unlawful for any person 11knowingly to manufacture or deliver, or possess with intent to 12manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance other than 13methamphetamine and other than bath salts as defined in the 14Bath Salts Prohibition Act sold or offered for sale in a retail 15mercantile establishment as defined in Section 16-0.1 of the 16Criminal Code of 2012, a counterfeit substance, or a 17controlled substance analog. A violation of this Act with 18respect to each of the controlled substances listed herein 19constitutes a single and separate violation of this Act. For 20purposes of this Section, "controlled substance analog" or 21"analog" means a substance, other than a controlled substance, 22which is not approved by the United States Food and Drug 23Administration or, if approved, is not dispensed or possessed   SB0280- 2 -LRB104 03922 RLC 13946 b1in accordance with State or federal law, and that has a 2chemical structure substantially similar to that of a 3controlled substance in Schedule I or II, or that was 4specifically designed to produce an effect substantially 5similar to that of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II. 6Examples of chemical classes in which controlled substance 7analogs are found include, but are not limited to, the 8following: phenethylamines, N-substituted piperidines, 9morphinans, ecgonines, quinazolinones, substituted indoles, 10and arylcycloalkylamines. For purposes of this Act, a 11controlled substance analog shall be treated in the same 12manner as the controlled substance to which it is 13substantially similar.14    (a) Any person who violates this Section with respect to 15the following amounts of controlled or counterfeit substances 16or controlled substance analogs, notwithstanding any of the 17provisions of subsections (c), (d), (e), (f), (g) or (h) to the 18contrary, is guilty of a Class X felony and shall be sentenced 19to a term of imprisonment as provided in this subsection (a) 20and fined as provided in subsection (b):21        (1)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 years 22    with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 100 grams of 23    a substance containing heroin, or an analog thereof;24        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 25    with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 400 grams 26    of a substance containing heroin, or an analog thereof;  SB0280- 3 -LRB104 03922 RLC 13946 b1        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years 2    with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 900 grams 3    of a substance containing heroin, or an analog thereof;4        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 5    with respect to 900 grams or more of any substance 6    containing heroin, or an analog thereof;7        (1.5)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 8    years with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 100 9    grams of a substance containing fentanyl, or an analog 10    thereof;11        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 12    with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 400 grams 13    of a substance containing fentanyl, or an analog thereof;14        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years 15    with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 900 grams 16    of a substance containing fentanyl, or an analog thereof;17        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 18    with respect to 900 grams or more of a substance 19    containing fentanyl, or an analog thereof;20        (2)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 years 21    with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 100 grams of 22    a substance containing cocaine, or an analog thereof;23        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 24    with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 400 grams 25    of a substance containing cocaine, or an analog thereof;26        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years   SB0280- 4 -LRB104 03922 RLC 13946 b1    with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 900 grams 2    of a substance containing cocaine, or an analog thereof;3        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 4    with respect to 900 grams or more of any substance 5    containing cocaine, or an analog thereof;6        (3)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 years 7    with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 100 grams of 8    a substance containing morphine, or an analog thereof;9        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 10    with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 400 grams 11    of a substance containing morphine, or an analog thereof;12        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years 13    with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 900 grams 14    of a substance containing morphine, or an analog thereof;15        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 16    with respect to 900 grams or more of a substance 17    containing morphine, or an analog thereof;18        (4) 200 grams or more of any substance containing 19    peyote, or an analog thereof;20        (5) 200 grams or more of any substance containing a 21    derivative of barbituric acid or any of the salts of a 22    derivative of barbituric acid, or an analog thereof;23        (6) 200 grams or more of any substance containing 24    amphetamine or any salt of an optical isomer of 25    amphetamine, or an analog thereof;26        (6.5) (blank);  SB0280- 5 -LRB104 03922 RLC 13946 b1        (6.6) (blank);2        (7)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 years 3    with respect to: (i) 15 grams or more but less than 100 4    grams of a substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide 5    (LSD), or an analog thereof, or (ii) 15 or more objects or 6    15 or more segregated parts of an object or objects but 7    less than 200 objects or 200 segregated parts of an object 8    or objects containing in them or having upon them any 9    amounts of any substance containing lysergic acid 10    diethylamide (LSD), or an analog thereof;11        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 12    with respect to: (i) 100 grams or more but less than 400 13    grams of a substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide 14    (LSD), or an analog thereof, or (ii) 200 or more objects or 15    200 or more segregated parts of an object or objects but 16    less than 600 objects or less than 600 segregated parts of 17    an object or objects containing in them or having upon 18    them any amount of any substance containing lysergic acid 19    diethylamide (LSD), or an analog thereof;20        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years 21    with respect to: (i) 400 grams or more but less than 900 22    grams of a substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide 23    (LSD), or an analog thereof, or (ii) 600 or more objects or 24    600 or more segregated parts of an object or objects but 25    less than 1500 objects or 1500 segregated parts of an 26    object or objects containing in them or having upon them   SB0280- 6 -LRB104 03922 RLC 13946 b1    any amount of any substance containing lysergic acid 2    diethylamide (LSD), or an analog thereof;3        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 4    with respect to: (i) 900 grams or more of any substance 5    containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), or an analog 6    thereof, or (ii) 1500 or more objects or 1500 or more 7    segregated parts of an object or objects containing in 8    them or having upon them any amount of a substance 9    containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), or an analog 10    thereof;11    (7.5)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 years 12    with respect to: (i) 15 grams or more but less than 100 13    grams of a substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), 14    (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or 15    (26) of subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or 16    derivative thereof, or (ii) 15 or more pills, tablets, 17    caplets, capsules, or objects but less than 200 pills, 18    tablets, caplets, capsules, or objects containing in them 19    or having upon them any amounts of any substance listed in 20    paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 21    (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of Section 22    204, or an analog or derivative thereof;23        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 24    with respect to: (i) 100 grams or more but less than 400 25    grams of a substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), 26    (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or   SB0280- 7 -LRB104 03922 RLC 13946 b1    (26) of subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or 2    derivative thereof, or (ii) 200 or more pills, tablets, 3    caplets, capsules, or objects but less than 600 pills, 4    tablets, caplets, capsules, or objects containing in them 5    or having upon them any amount of any substance listed in 6    paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 7    (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of Section 8    204, or an analog or derivative thereof;9        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years 10    with respect to: (i) 400 grams or more but less than 900 11    grams of a substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), 12    (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or 13    (26) of subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or 14    derivative thereof, or (ii) 600 or more pills, tablets, 15    caplets, capsules, or objects but less than 1,500 pills, 16    tablets, caplets, capsules, or objects containing in them 17    or having upon them any amount of any substance listed in 18    paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 19    (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of Section 20    204, or an analog or derivative thereof;21        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 22    with respect to: (i) 900 grams or more of any substance 23    listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), 24    (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) 25    of Section 204, or an analog or derivative thereof, or 26    (ii) 1,500 or more pills, tablets, caplets, capsules, or   SB0280- 8 -LRB104 03922 RLC 13946 b1    objects containing in them or having upon them any amount 2    of a substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), 3    (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of 4    subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or derivative 5    thereof;6        (8) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 7    pentazocine or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 8    isomers of pentazocine, or an analog thereof;9        (9) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 10    methaqualone or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 11    isomers of methaqualone, or an analog thereof;12        (10) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 13    phencyclidine or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 14    isomers of phencyclidine (PCP), or an analog thereof;15        (10.5) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 16    ketamine or any of the salts, isomers and salts of isomers 17    of ketamine, or an analog thereof;18        (10.6) 100 grams or more of any substance containing 19    hydrocodone, or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 20    isomers of hydrocodone, or an analog thereof;21        (10.7) (blank);22        (10.8) 100 grams or more of any substance containing 23    dihydrocodeine, or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 24    isomers of dihydrocodeine, or an analog thereof;25        (10.9) 100 grams or more of any substance containing 26    oxycodone, or any of the salts, isomers and salts of   SB0280- 9 -LRB104 03922 RLC 13946 b1    isomers of oxycodone, or an analog thereof;2        (11) 200 grams or more of any substance containing any 3    other controlled substance classified in Schedules I or 4    II, or an analog thereof, which is not otherwise included 5    in this subsection.6    (b) Any person sentenced with respect to violations of 7paragraph (1), (2), (3), (7), or (7.5) of subsection (a) 8involving 100 grams or more of the controlled substance named 9therein, may in addition to the penalties provided therein, be 10fined an amount not more than $500,000 or the full street value 11of the controlled or counterfeit substance or controlled 12substance analog, whichever is greater. The term "street 13value" shall have the meaning ascribed in Section 110-5 of the 14Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. Any person sentenced with 15respect to any other provision of subsection (a), may in 16addition to the penalties provided therein, be fined an amount 17not to exceed $500,000.18    (b-1) Excluding violations of this Act when the controlled 19substance is fentanyl, any person sentenced to a term of 20imprisonment with respect to violations of Section 401, 401.1, 21405, 405.1, 405.2, or 407, when the substance containing the 22controlled substance contains any amount of fentanyl, 3 years 23shall be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the 24court, and the maximum sentence for the offense shall be 25increased by 3 years.26    (c) Any person who violates this Section with regard to   SB0280- 10 -LRB104 03922 RLC 13946 b1the following amounts of controlled or counterfeit substances 2or controlled substance analogs, notwithstanding any of the 3provisions of subsections (a), (b), (d), (e), (f), (g) or (h) 4to the contrary, is guilty of a Class 1 felony. The fine for 5violation of this subsection (c) shall not be more than 6$250,000:7        (1) 1 gram or more but less than 15 grams of any 8    substance containing heroin, or an analog thereof;9        (1.5) 1 gram or more but less than 15 grams of any 10    substance containing fentanyl, or an analog thereof;11        (2) 1 gram or more but less than 15 grams of any 12    substance containing cocaine, or an analog thereof;13        (3) 10 grams or more but less than 15 grams of any 14    substance containing morphine, or an analog thereof;15        (4) 50 grams or more but less than 200 grams of any 16    substance containing peyote, or an analog thereof;17        (5) 50 grams or more but less than 200 grams of any 18    substance containing a derivative of barbituric acid or 19    any of the salts of a derivative of barbituric acid, or an 20    analog thereof;21        (6) 50 grams or more but less than 200 grams of any 22    substance containing amphetamine or any salt of an optical 23    isomer of amphetamine, or an analog thereof;24        (6.5) (blank);25        (7)(i) 5 grams or more but less than 15 grams of any 26    substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), or   SB0280- 11 -LRB104 03922 RLC 13946 b1    an analog thereof, or (ii) more than 10 objects or more 2    than 10 segregated parts of an object or objects but less 3    than 15 objects or less than 15 segregated parts of an 4    object containing in them or having upon them any amount 5    of any substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide 6    (LSD), or an analog thereof;7        (7.5)(i) 5 grams or more but less than 15 grams of any 8    substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), 9    (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of 10    subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or derivative 11    thereof, or (ii) more than 10 pills, tablets, caplets, 12    capsules, or objects but less than 15 pills, tablets, 13    caplets, capsules, or objects containing in them or having 14    upon them any amount of any substance listed in paragraph 15    (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), 16    (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of Section 204, or an 17    analog or derivative thereof;18        (8) 10 grams or more but less than 30 grams of any 19    substance containing pentazocine or any of the salts, 20    isomers and salts of isomers of pentazocine, or an analog 21    thereof;22        (9) 10 grams or more but less than 30 grams of any 23    substance containing methaqualone or any of the salts, 24    isomers and salts of isomers of methaqualone, or an analog 25    thereof;26        (10) 10 grams or more but less than 30 grams of any   SB0280- 12 -LRB104 03922 RLC 13946 b1    substance containing phencyclidine or any of the salts, 2    isomers and salts of isomers of phencyclidine (PCP), or an 3    analog thereof;4        (10.5) 10 grams or more but less than 30 grams of any 5    substance containing ketamine or any of the salts, isomers 6    and salts of isomers of ketamine, or an analog thereof;7        (10.6) 50 grams or more but less than 100 grams of any 8    substance containing hydrocodone, or any of the salts, 9    isomers and salts of isomers of hydrocodone, or an analog 10    thereof;11        (10.7) (blank);12        (10.8) 50 grams or more but less than 100 grams of any 13    substance containing dihydrocodeine, or any of the salts, 14    isomers and salts of isomers of dihydrocodeine, or an 15    analog thereof;16        (10.9) 50 grams or more but less than 100 grams of any 17    substance containing oxycodone, or any of the salts, 18    isomers and salts of isomers of oxycodone, or an analog 19    thereof;20        (11) 50 grams or more but less than 200 grams of any 21    substance containing a substance classified in Schedules I 22    or II, or an analog thereof, which is not otherwise 23    included in this subsection.24    (c-5) (Blank).25    (d) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 26any other amount of a controlled or counterfeit substance   SB0280- 13 -LRB104 03922 RLC 13946 b1containing dihydrocodeine or classified in Schedules I or II, 2or an analog thereof, which is (i) a narcotic drug, (ii) 3lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD) or an analog thereof, (iii) 4any substance containing amphetamine or fentanyl or any salt 5or optical isomer of amphetamine or fentanyl, or an analog 6thereof, or (iv) any substance containing N-Benzylpiperazine 7(BZP) or any salt or optical isomer of N-Benzylpiperazine 8(BZP), or an analog thereof, is guilty of a Class 2 felony. The 9fine for violation of this subsection (d) shall not be more 10than $200,000.11    (d-1) In addition to any other penalties provided by law, 12a person unlawfully selling or dispensing any scheduled drug 13containing a detectable amount of fentanyl is guilty of a 14Class X felony and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment 15of not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years or fined 16not more than $250,000, or both.17    (d-5) (Blank).18    (e) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 19any other amount of a controlled substance other than 20methamphetamine or counterfeit substance classified in 21Schedule I or II, or an analog thereof, which substance is not 22included under subsection (d) of this Section, is guilty of a 23Class 3 felony. The fine for violation of this subsection (e) 24shall not be more than $150,000.25    (f) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 26any other amount of a controlled or counterfeit substance   SB0280- 14 -LRB104 03922 RLC 13946 b1classified in Schedule III is guilty of a Class 3 felony. The 2fine for violation of this subsection (f) shall not be more 3than $125,000.4    (g) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 5any other amount of a controlled or counterfeit substance 6classified in Schedule IV is guilty of a Class 3 felony. The 7fine for violation of this subsection (g) shall not be more 8than $100,000.9    (h) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 10any other amount of a controlled or counterfeit substance 11classified in Schedule V is guilty of a Class 3 felony. The 12fine for violation of this subsection (h) shall not be more 13than $75,000.14    (i) This Section does not apply to the manufacture, 15possession or distribution of a substance in conformance with 16the provisions of an approved new drug application or an 17exemption for investigational use within the meaning of 18Section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act.19    (j) (Blank).20(Source: P.A. 99-371, eff. 1-1-16; 99-585, eff. 1-1-17; 21100-368, eff. 1-1-18.) 22    (720 ILCS 570/401.1)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1401.1)23    Sec. 401.1. Controlled Substance Trafficking. 24    (a) Except for purposes as authorized by this Act, any 25person who knowingly brings or causes to be brought into this   SB0280- 15 -LRB104 03922 RLC 13946 b1State for the purpose of manufacture or delivery or with the 2intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance other 3than methamphetamine or counterfeit substance in this or any 4other state or country is guilty of controlled substance 5trafficking.6    (b) A person convicted of controlled substance trafficking 7shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment not less than 8twice the minimum term and fined an amount as authorized by 9Section 401 of this Act, based upon the amount of controlled or 10counterfeit substance brought or caused to be brought into 11this State, and not more than twice the maximum term of 12imprisonment and fined twice the amount as authorized by 13Section 401 of this Act, based upon the amount of controlled or 14counterfeit substance brought or caused to be brought into 15this State.16    (c) It shall be a Class 2 felony for which a fine not to 17exceed $100,000 may be imposed for any person to knowingly use 18a cellular radio telecommunication device in the furtherance 19of controlled substance trafficking. This penalty shall be in 20addition to any other penalties imposed by law.21    (d) It shall be a Class 1 felony for which a fine not to 22exceed $100,000 may be imposed for any person to knowingly use 23an electronic communication device in the furtherance of 24controlled substance trafficking involving a substance 25containing any amount of fentanyl. This penalty shall be in 26addition to any other penalties imposed by law. For purposes   SB0280- 16 -LRB104 03922 RLC 13946 b1of this subsection (d):2    "Computer" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 317-0.5 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 4    "Electronic communication device" means an electronic 5device, including, but not limited to, a wireless telephone, 6personal digital assistant, or a portable or mobile computer, 7that is capable of transmitting images or pictures. 8(Source: P.A. 94-556, eff. 9-11-05.)